District of Columbia statutes.
49-504

Constitution; jurisdiction; procedure.

The constitution and jurisdiction of military courts, the form and manner in which their proceedings shall be conducted and reported, and the forms of oaths and affirmations taken in the administration of military law by such courts, the limits of punishment and the proceedings in revision shall be governed by the Articles of War and the law and procedure of the military courts of the United States.

History

Mar. 1, 1889, 25 Stat. 779, ch. 328
as added Feb. 18, 1909, 35 Stat. 634, ch. 146, § 57

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 39-804.
1973 Ed., § 39-704.

References in Text

Articles of War, referred to near the end of this section, refer to those codified in United States Revised Statutes, § 1342, Articles 1 to 128, which were repealed by the Act of June 4, 1920, 41 Stat. 812, ch. 227, § 4, and are now covered by the Uniform Code of Military Justice, § 1 of the Act of August 10, 1956, 70A Stat. 36.